Utah statutes.
76-10-1309.   Enhanced penalties -- HIV positive offender.
A person who is an HIV positive individual and has actual knowledge of that
fact and has received written personal notice of the positive test results
from a law enforcement agency pursuant to Section 76-10-1312 and is convicted
of:
(1)  prostitution under Section 76-10-1302 shall be guilty of a felony of the
third degree;
(2)  patronizing a prostitute under Section 76-10-1303 shall be guilty of a
felony of a third degree; or
(3)  sexual solicitation under Section 76-10-1313 shall be guilty of a felony
of the third degree.
